Wyoming, session 2026, HB0063.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. For the period beginning July 1, 2026 and
ending June 30, 2028, reimbursement for services provided
by skilled nursing homes authorized under the Wyoming
Medical Assistance and Services Act shall be increased by
five percent (5%). This reimbursement rate shall apply if
HB0063

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0303
the services to be reimbursed were rendered during the
period beginning July 1, 2026 and ending June 30, 2028.

Section 2. The department of health shall report to
the joint appropriations committee and the joint labor,
health and social services interim committee not later than
October 31, 2027 regarding the additional costs incurred by
the increased reimbursement rate required by this act. The
report required by this section shall include any
recommendations for modifications to the reimbursement rate
for services provided by skilled nursing homes under the
Wyoming Medical Assistance and Services Act.

Section 3. There is appropriated four million seven
hundred thousand dollars ($4,700,000.00) from the general
fund and four million seven hundred thousand dollars
($4,700,000.00) from federal funds to the department of
health for purposes of increasing the reimbursement rate
for services provided by skilled nursing homes as provided
by this act. These appropriations shall be for the period
beginning July 1, 2026 and ending June 30, 2028. These
appropriations shall not be transferred or expended for any
other purpose and any unexpended, unobligated funds
HB0063

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0303
remaining from these appropriations shall revert as
provided by law on June 30, 2028. It is the intent of the
legislature that these appropriations be included in the
standard budget for the department of health for the
immediately succeeding fiscal biennium.

Section 4. The department of health shall promulgate
all rules necessary to implement this act.

Section 5.

(a) Except as provided by subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective July 1, 2026.

(b) Sections 4 and 5 of this act are effective
immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a
bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of
the Wyoming Constitution.

(END)
HB0063